Tennessee, session 114, HB0849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 1-3-105(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (19) and substituting instead:
(19) "Person":
(A) Includes a corporation, firm, company, or association; and
(B) Does not include artificial intelligence, a computer algorithm, a
software program, computer hardware, or any type of machine;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 1-3-105(a), is amended by adding
the following new, appropriately designated subdivisions:
( ) "Human being" means an individual living member of the species, homo
sapiens, including the unborn human being during the entire embryonic and fetal stages
from fertilization to full gestation;
( ) "Life":
(A) Means the condition that distinguishes animals from inorganic matter,
including the capacity for growth, reproduction, functional activity, and continual
change preceding death; and
(B) Does not include artificial intelligence, a computer algorithm, a
software program, computer hardware, or any type of machine;
( ) "Natural person":
(A) Means an individual living member of the species, homo sapiens; and
HB0849
001744
- 1 -

(B) Does not include artificial intelligence, a computer algorithm, a
software program, computer hardware, or any type of machine;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001744